Idaho, session 2025, S1172.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Commerce for the Broadband
Office Program $140,900 to be expended for personnel costs from the General
Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
there is hereby reduced from the Department of Commerce for the Commerce Pro-
gram $140,900 for personnel costs from the General Fund for the period July
1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.